hu_HU.aff
SFX A   0    dékéban      [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékéba       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    déké         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékul        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    déktól       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékról       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékra        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékon        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    déknál       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    déknak       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékká        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékkal       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékig        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékhoz       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékból       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékban       [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékba        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dékat        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dék          [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    déig         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    déhoz        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    déból        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    déban        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    déba         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dé           [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dul          [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dtól         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dról         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dra          [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    don          [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dnál         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dnak         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dként        [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dkor         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dig          [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dhoz         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    ddá          [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    ddal         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dból         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dban         [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dba          [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    dat          [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    d            [iuáéíóõúûü]
SFX A   0    cskáért      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskává       [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskával      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskául       [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskától      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskát        [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskát        [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskáról      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskára       [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskánál      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskának      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskán        [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákért     [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákul      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskáktól     [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákról     [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákra      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákon      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskáknál     [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskáknak     [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákká      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákkal     [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákig      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákhoz     [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákból     [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákban     [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákba      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákat      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskákat      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskák        [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskáig       [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskához      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskából      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskában      [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cskába       [iouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX A   0    cska         [iouáéíóõöúûü]

PFX a Y 9
PFX a   0    ötven        .
PFX a   0    tizen        .
PFX a   0    nyolcvan     .
PFX a   0    negyven      .
PFX a   0    kilencven    .
PFX a   0    huszon       .
PFX a   0    hetven       .
PFX a   0    hatvan       .
PFX a   0    harminc      .

PFX X Y 59
PFX X   0    újra         .
PFX X   0    újjá         .
PFX X   0    össze        .
PFX X   0    át           .
PFX X   0    által        .
PFX X   0    végig        .
PFX X   0    végbe        .
PFX X   0    vissza       .
PFX X   0    utána        .
PFX X   0    túl          .
PFX X   0    tovább       .
PFX X   0    tova         .
PFX X   0    tele         .
PFX X   0    szét         .
PFX X   0    széjjel      .
PFX X   0    szerte       .
PFX X   0    szembe       .
PFX X   0    rá           .
PFX X   0    rajta        .
PFX X   0    oda          .
PFX X   0    neki         .
PFX X   0    mellé        .
PFX X   0    meg          .
PFX X   0    le           .
PFX X   0    külön        .
PFX X   0    közre        .
PFX X   0    közbe        .
PFX X   0    körül        .
PFX X   0    körbe        .
PFX X   0    kölcsön      .
PFX X   0    ki           .
PFX X   0    ketté        .
PFX X   0    keresztül    .
PFX X   0    jóvá         .
PFX X   0    ide          .
PFX X   0    hátra        .
PFX X   0    hozzá        .
PFX X   0    helyre       .
PFX X   0    haza         .
PFX X   0    fönn         .
PFX X   0    fölül        .
PFX X   0    föl          .
PFX X   0    félre        .
PFX X   0    félbe        .
PFX X   0    fenn         .
PFX X   0    felül        .
PFX X   0    fel          .
PFX X   0    elõre        .
PFX X   0    elõ          .
PFX X   0    ellen        .
PFX X   0    el           .
PFX X   0    együtt       .
PFX X   0    egybe        .
PFX X   0    benn         .
PFX X   0    bele         .
PFX X   0    be           .
PFX X   0    alá          .
PFX X   0    agyon        .
PFX X   0    abba         .

PFX D Y 2
PFX D   0    legesleg     .
PFX D   0    leg          .
