hu_HU.dic
ötödszörre/a
ötödszöri/a
ötödször/a
ötödik/VLlTa
ötöd/WMmTa
ötszörös/WDHTa
ötször/a
ötmillió/AUKkQa
ötmilliárd/AUKkQa
öthalomi/ADFUQK
ötezrek/Ia
ötezerszer/a
ötezer/AUSa
öten/a
öt/WMmRaY
összevonódtatás/AUKkSYcXD
ökleltetés/BVLlTYcXD
õröltethet/JXEeX
óbégatás/AUKkSYcXD
érvényteleníthetõ/CDHWRMX
értekezõdtetett/BDGRVX
égerszögi/BDGVRL
átszüremkedtethet/JXEeX
álszakáll/AUYc
álnok/ADFUKQ
áldozandó/ADFUQKX
zárkóztatott/ADFQUX
záradékolandó/ADFUQKX
zsûrizhetetlen/BDGVLRX
zengethetõ/CDHWRMX
zakatolhat/OXJX
zagyválhatatlan/ADFUKQX
vélemény/BVLlTYcD
várathatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
vágyatható/ADFUQKX
vonzhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
vizesíthetetlen/BDGVLRX
világoszöld/BVLNylRYcD
világias/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
vihetõség/BVLlTYcXD
verselgethetõség/BVLlTYcXD
verekszel/X
vallási/ADFUQK
vajazandó/ADFUQKX
vadul/OoX
ugribugriság/AUKkSYc
tüsténkedés/BVLlTYcXD
tündöklõ/CDHWRMXYCDHMWXRY
töltszéki/BDGVRL
tököltetõ/CDHWRMXY
tárgyiasíttatás/AUKkSYcXD
tárcsázó/ADFUQKXY
tányéroztató/ADFUQKXY
trágárkodás/AUKkSYcXD
tromfoltatható/ADFUQKX
transzport/AUKykQYcD
tokásodik/OX
tojóláda/AUKQykYcD
tisztító/AUKQkYcDADFUQKXY
testesedhet/JXEX
teríttetés/BVLlTYcXD
tekézik/EX
tekercselhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
tartatás/AUKkSYcXD
tanácskozhat/OXJX
találgató/ADFUQKXY
tacsi/ADFUQK
sújtathatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
sípoló/ADFUQKXY
szúratott/ADFQUX
szögelõ/CWMRmYcD
szívtipró/AUKQkYcD
szépíttethet/JXEeX
szédíthetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
szájalhat/OoXJX
szutykos/ADFUKS
szunyáló/ADFUQKXY
szocializálhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
szklabonyai/ADFUQK
szirup/AUKkQYcD
szeretgethetõ/CDHWRMX
szeplõsíthetetlen/BDGVLRX
szekírozható/ADFUQKX
szegényültet/EeX
szegmens/BVLlTYcD
szagosíttat/OoX
szaglászandó/ADFUQKX
szabványozottság/AUKkSYc
stimmelhetõ/CDHWRMX
stafírozhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
specifikálható/ADFUQKX
smakkoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
skaláregyenlet/BVLlRYcD
sifrírozás/AUKkSYcXD
senyvesztetõ/CDHWRMXY
sebesíthetõség/BVLlTYcXD
rövidíthet/JXEeX
révfalui/ADFUQK
ránctalanítandó/ADFUQKX
ráncosítandó/ADFUQKX
rudaztatható/ADFUQKX
rokoníttatás/AUKkSYcXD
rokkantnyugdíjas/ADFUKS
rikoltozhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
revanzsál/OoX
rendelet/BVLlTYcD
rektifikálható/AUKQkYcDADFUQKX
reklámozhat/OoXJX
rakogathatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
rajtakapás/AUKkSYcXD
púposíthatóság/AUKkSYcXD
pélpusztai/ADFUQK
példálózott/ADFQUX
pulpitus/AUKkSYcD
pufferolhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
puffadt/ADFUKQADFQUX
pottyantó/ADFUQKXY
posztulált/ADFQUX
porzás/AUKkSYcXDAUKSXY
planimetria/AUKQkYcD
planetárium/AUKkSYcD
piszkálhat/OoXJX
perszóna/AUKQkYcD
pergethetetlen/BDGVLRX
pattantatható/ADFUQKX
parádézó/ADFUQKXY
particionálhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
pajsáni/ADFUQK
ottfelejthetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
osztozkodik/OX
oláhborosbocsárdi/ADFUQK
oligocén/BVLlRYcD
okoskodott/ADFQUX
négyszeres/VDGTa
négyszer/a
négymillió/AUKkQa
négymilliárd/AUKkQa
négyezrek/Ia
négyezerszer/a
négyezer/AUSa
négyes/VDGTa
négy/VLlTaY
nászajándék/AUKykSYcD
nyújtóztathat/OoXJX
nyíribronyi/ADFUQK
nyolcszoros/AUKkSYcDAUDFSa
nyolcszor/a
nyolcmillió/AUKkQa
nyolcmilliárd/AUKkQa
nyolcezerszer/a
nyolcezer/AUSa
nyolcas/AUDFSa
nyolcan/a
nyolcak/Ia
nyolcadszorra/a
nyolcadszori/a
nyolcadszor/a
nyolcadik/AUKkSa
nyolcad/AUKkSa
nyolc/AUaY
nyisszantható/ADFUQKX
nyilallhat/OXJX
nyaldosható/ADFUQKX
neszelés/BVLlTYcXD
nemesbíthet/JXEeX
negyedszerre/a
negyedszeri/a
negyedszer/a
negyed/VLlTaBVLlTYcD
nagylóki/ADFUQK
nagykosztolányi/ADFUQK
mérsékelõdtethetõ/CDHWRMX
méredzkedés/BVLlTYcXD
májfolt/AUKykQYcD
mulaszt/OoX
mozgolódás/AUKkSYcXDAUKkSYcD
moholyi/ADFUQK
minimalizálható/ADFUQKX
meóztat/OoX
mellesztetendõ/CDHWRMX
megszigorodhat/OoXJX
megstuccoltatható/ADFUQKX
megfeneklett/BDGVLRBDGRVX
maszatolandó/ADFUQKX
marháskodó/ADFUQKXY
manipulálhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
macerál/OoX
lötyögtettetett/BDGRVX
lóki/ADFUQK
lécelt/BDGRVX
lábnyom/AUKykSYcD
lombozat/AUKkSYcD
lobbanás/AUKkSYcXD
leölhetõ/CDHWRM
lelombozódtat/OoX
lejattoltatott/ADFQUX
legitimáltatott/ADFQUX
lebbenhet/JXEX
lanyha/ADFUQK
küldözgethet/JXEeX
kúszathatatlan/ADFUKQX
kövezet/BVLlTYcD
könyöröghet/JXEeX
kõrösszegapáti/BDGVRL
kétszeres/VDGTaBDGVLT
kétszer/a
kétmillió/AUKkQa
kétmilliárd/AUKkQa
kétezrek/Ia
kétezerszer/a
készíttet/EeX
kérdetés/BVLlTYcXD
kárpitozás/AUKkSYcXD
károsultató/ADFUQKXY
kutyulódtatás/AUKkSYcXD
kukultathat/OoXJX
kucorogás/AUKkSYcXD
krakélereskedendõ/CDHWRMX
korrumpálható/ADFUQKX
korhasztatandó/ADFUQKX
konszolidálható/ADFUQKX
kompánia/AUKQkYcD
komp/AUKkQYcD
kokettáltató/ADFUQKXY
kivágott/ADFUQ
kirablás/AUKkSYcD
kinyilatkoztathatatlan/ADFUKQX
kilencszeres/VDGTa
kilencmillió/AUKkQa
kilencezrek/Ia
kilencezer/AUSa
kilencedszerre/a
kilencedszer/a
kilenced/VLlTa
kifogásoló/ADFUQKXY
kezdetendõ/CDHWRMX
kettõmillió/AUKkQa
kettõezerszer/a
kettõ/WMmRa
ketten/a
kettedszeri/a
kettedik/VLlTa
kelthetõ/CDHWRMX
karima/AUKQykYcD
kapálózhat/OXJX
kalapozható/ADFUQKX
kakecoltatható/ADFUQKX
jelenetezett/BDGRVX
javultatás/AUKkSYcXD
istápoltatott/ADFQUX
invitálhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
indíthat/OoXJX
illatosító/AUKQkYcDADFUQKXY
ige/BVLRlYcD
híresülhet/JXEX
hétszeres/VDGTaBDGVLT
hétmillió/AUKkQa
hétezrek/Ia
hétezer/AUSa
háryjános/AUKkSYcD
háromszoros/AUDFSa
hárommillió/AUKkQa
háromezrek/Ia
háromezer/AUSa
hármas/AUDFSaADFUKS
hármak/IaIJY
hunyadfalvai/ADFUQK
horpasz/AUKkSYcD
hipnotizáltathat/OoXJX
heten/a
hetedszerre/a
hetedszer/a
heted/VLlTa
hernyópázsit/AUKkQYcD
hengergettethetõ/CDHWRMX
hatszor/a
hatodszorra/a
hatodszor/a
hatod/AUKkSa
hatmilliárd/AUKkQa
hatezerszer/a
hatan/a
harmadszorra/a
harmadszor/a
harmad/AUKkSaAUKkSYcD
harangoz/OoX
haragos/ADFUKS
halasztódható/ADFUQKX
hajhászható/ADFUQKX
gõgösködtethetõ/CDHWRMX
gyökereztettetett/BDGRVX
gyulladásos/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
gondolázott/ADFQUX
gombos/ADFUKS
genus/AUKkSYcD
fújt/ADFQUX
fõzhetõ/CDHWRMX
félmeztelen/BDGVLR
frusztrálhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
fonódott/ADFQUX
fojtogató/ADFUQKXY
foganatos/ADFUKS
festékpárna/AUKQykYcD
fenetõ/CDHWRMXY
felszámolódó/ADFUQKXY
fauna/AUKQkYcD
ezermesterkedhetõ/CDHWRMX
ezermesterkedhet/JXEeX
esztétikus/ADFUKS
elviselõdött/CDHRWX
eltaccsoló/ADFUQKXY
elmebajosság/AUKkSYc
egységesedett/BDGRVX
egyszer/a
egymilliárd/AUKkQa
egyezer/AUSa
egyetért/EX
egyedszerre/a
egyedszer/a
egy/VLlaY
ebonit/AUKkQYcD
drótozható/ADFUQKX
drágíthat/OoXJX
doroszlói/ADFUQK
diagnózis/AUKkSYcD
demokratizálódott/ADFQUX
deleálhatatlan/ADFUKQX
datolyaszilva/AUKQykYcD
csírátlaníthatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
csévézés/BVLlTYcXD
császárkodandó/ADFUQKX
csikszeredai/ADFUQK
cserkelhetetlenség/BVLlTYcXD
csengetés/BVLlTYcXD
civilizált/ADFUQADFQUX
cefrézhet/JXEeX
búsultató/ADFUQKXY
bírhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
bujkálás/AUKkSYcXD
bugyolálgató/ADFUQKXY
brusztolhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
bomladoztatás/AUKkSYcXD
birizgálható/ADFUQKX
billegtettetés/BVLlTYcXD
bika/AUKQkYcD
befírolt/ADFQUX
bebújós/AUKkSYcD
barázdáltatott/ADFQUX
avultatható/ADFUQKX
apasztathatóság/AUKkSYcXD
anyáskodás/AUKkSYcXD
alnádasi/ADFUQK
allegorizálandó/ADFUQKX
akklimatizálódás/AUKkSYcXD
agyabugyálhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
Válaszút/AUKQ
Székelyszabar/AUKQ
Rohov/AUKS
Nyírlugos/AUKS
Makfalva/AUKQ
Klokocsó/AUKQ
Idvor/AUKQ
Furluk/AUKQ
Bojt/AUKQ
